Hawaii, session 2026, SB2932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§107-    Universal changing accommodations; state buildings.  (a)  Beginning July 1, 2028, any state building construction, including: (1)  The construction of new state buildings; and (2)  Improvements or renovations to existing state buildings, shall provide at least one universal changing accommodation in any restroom for public use that is designated as a family or assisted-use restroom, unless technically infeasible. (b) In each state building constructed, improved, or renovated pursuant to subsection (a), the department or agency responsible for the management of the state building shall conspicuously post signage indicating the location of any universal changing accommodation. (c)  For the purposes of this section: "Family or assisted-use restroom" has the same meaning as "family or assisted-use toilet room" or similar terms are defined in the Hawaii state building code. "Restroom for public use" means a restroom that is accessible to persons other than state employees. "Technically infeasible" has the same meaning as the term is defined in the 2010 Americans with Disabilities Act Standards for Accessible Design, title 28 Code of Federal Regulations part 36, appendix D, section 106.5. "Universal changing accommodation" means a powered, height‑adjustable adult changing station that is floor‑ or wall-mounted and installed in an enclosed public restroom facility." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2525.